California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) During the seven-day holding period specified in subdivision (a), every secondhand dealer and coin dealer shall produce any tangible personal property reported pursuant to Sections 21628 and 21630 for inspection by any peace officer or employee designated by the local licensing authority or the Department of Justice.

(c) Tangible personal property subject to inspection as specified in subdivision (b) and all tangible personal property held in pawn that is stored off the business premises of the licensee shall, upon request for inspection, be produced at the licensee’s business premises within
 one business day of a request by the local licensing authority or the Department of Justice.

(d) (1) If 5 days have elapsed since the transmission of the report of acquisition pursuant to Section 21628 or 21630, the remainder of the seven-day hold specified in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any tangible personal property sold by the secondhand dealer or coin dealer when the following are present:

(A) The
 secondhand dealer or coin dealer has recorded the sale in its book of records.

(B) The record of sale includes:

(i) The name of buyer to whom the tangible personal property was sold.

(ii) The buyer’s address.

(iii) At least one of the following:

(I) The buyer’s telephone number.

(II) The buyer’s email address.

(III) The buyer’s electronic address for receiving text messages.

(2) In documenting the record of sale as set
 forth in paragraph (1), the secondhand dealer or coin dealer shall record the information provided by the buyer and shall not have any duty to verify the accuracy of the information provided by the buyer.

(3) The information collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be retained by the secondhand dealer or coin dealer for 21 days following the date of sale of the property by the secondhand dealer or coin dealer and shall be available for inspection by a local law enforcement agency during this period.

(4) If a sale of property is made pursuant to this subdivision, and within 21 days of the sale a local law enforcement agency notifies the secondhand dealer or coin
 dealer that the property has been reported stolen, the record of the sale and all information contained therein shall be provided to that local law enforcement agency by the secondhand dealer or coin dealer upon written request by that agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 184, Sec. 2.   (AB 1993)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21636.5.

No secondhand dealer or coin dealer shall promise a seller of tangible property that the seller may repurchase property sold to the secondhand dealer or coin dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 884, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21636.6.

It is unlawful for any person, who is required to be licensed under Section 21640, to publicly advertise any matter relating to the business for which the license is required without including the license number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 647, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21637.

Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to excuse compliance with the provisions of any city, county, or city and county ordinance or any other state law pertaining to or covering the reporting, holding, or releasing of tangible personal property, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, except that no city, county, or city and county or any other state agency shall adopt the following:

(a) Holding, reporting, or identification requirements for transactions involving coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals.

(b) Identification, holding, or reporting requirements for the acquisition of tangible personal property, in
 the ordinary course of business, by pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, other than as set forth in Sections 21628, 21630, 21633, and 21636 of this code, and commencing July 1, 2010, Section 21628.2 of this code, and Section 21208 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 335, Sec. 7.   (SB 449)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21638.

The provisions of this article shall not prohibit enactment, amendment, or enforcement by any city, county, or city and county of any local ordinance relating to a secondhand dealer or coin dealer which is not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, except that no city, county, or city and county, or any other state agency shall adopt the following:

(a) Holding, reporting, or identification requirements for transactions involving coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals.

(b) Identification, holding, or reporting requirements for the acquisition of tangible personal property, in the ordinary course of business, by
 pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, other than as set forth in Sections 21628, 21630, 21633, and 21636 of this code, and commencing July 1, 2010, Section 21628.2 of this code, and Section 21208 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 335, Sec. 8.   (SB 449)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21638.5.

Sections 21636, 21636.1, 21637, and 21638, insofar as they apply to holding periods for personal property, are not applicable to personal property pledged to a pawnbroker with respect to the redemption of personal property by the pledgor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 91.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21640.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of secondhand dealer, as defined in Section 21626, without being licensed as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 499, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

21641.

(a) The chief of police, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission, shall accept an application for and grant a license permitting the licensee to engage in the business of secondhand dealer, as defined in Section 21626, to an applicant who has not been convicted of an attempt to receive stolen property or any other offense involving stolen property. Prior to the granting of a license, the licensing authority shall submit the application to the Department of Justice. If the Department of Justice does not comment on the application within 30 days thereafter, the licensing authority may grant the applicant a license. All forms for application and licensure, and license renewal, shall be prescribed and provided by the
 Department of Justice. A fee shall be charged to the applicant by the Department of Justice as specified in Section 21642.5. The licensing authority shall collect the fee and transmit the fee to the Department of Justice. In addition, the police chief, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission, may charge a fee to the applicant not to exceed the actual costs incurred to process the application and to collect and transmit the fee charged by the Department of Justice.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “convicted” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no person shall be denied a secondhand dealer’s license solely on the grounds that he or she violated any
 provision contained in this article or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650), or any provision contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200) of Division 8 of the Financial Code, unless the violation demonstrates a pattern of conduct.

(d) Any person licensed as a firearms dealer pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code, who is conducting business at gun shows or events pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26805 of the Penal Code, and who has a valid secondhand dealer license granted by the appropriate local authorities in the jurisdiction where the firearms dealer license has been granted, shall be authorized to conduct business as a secondhand dealer at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, without regard to the
 jurisdiction within this state that issued the secondhand dealer license pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section. No additional fees or separate secondhand dealer license shall be required by any agency having jurisdiction over the locality where the gun show or event is conducted. However, the person shall otherwise be subject to, and comply with, the requirements of this article when he or she acts as a secondhand dealer at the gun show or event to the same extent as if he or she were licensed as a secondhand dealer in the jurisdiction in which the gun show or event is being conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 172, Sec. 4.   (AB 391)   Effective August 17, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21642.

(a) A license granted pursuant to Section 21641 shall be renewable the second year from the date of issue, and every other year thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a license renewal fee specified by the licensing authority, as described in this subdivision. The Department of Justice shall also charge a fee, as specified in Section 21642.5. The licensing authority shall collect the fee and transmit the fee and a copy of the renewed license to the Department of Justice. The police chief, sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission may charge a fee not to exceed the actual costs incurred to process the renewal application of the licensee and to collect and transmit the
 fee charged by the Department of Justice.

(b) The license shall be subject to forfeiture by the licensing authority and the licensee’s activities as a secondhand dealer shall be subject to being enjoined pursuant to Section 21646 for breach of any of the following conditions:

(1) The business shall be carried on only at the location designated on the license. The license shall designate all locations where property belonging to the business is stored. Property of the business may be stored at locations not designated on the license only with the written consent of the local licensing authority.

(2) The license or a copy thereof, certified by the licensing authority, shall be displayed on the premises in plain view of the public.

(3) The licensee shall not engage in any act which the licensee knows to be in violation of this article.

(4) The licensee shall not be convicted of an attempt to receive stolen property or any other offense involving stolen property. For the purposes of this paragraph, “convicted” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action which the chief of police, the sheriff, or, where appropriate, the police commission is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section
 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), no person shall have his or her renewal application for a secondhand dealer’s license denied, nor shall his or her secondhand dealer’s license be forfeited solely on the grounds that he or she violated any provision contained in this article or Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650), or any provision contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21200) of Division 8 of the Financial Code, unless the violation demonstrates a pattern of conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 172, Sec. 5.   (AB 391)   Effective August 17, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21642.5.

(a) The Department of Justice shall require each applicant for an initial license under Section 21641 of this code or Section 21300 of the Financial Code and each applicant for renewal of a license under Section 21642 of this code or Section 21301 of the Financial Code to pay a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300), but in no event exceeding the costs described in subdivision (b), except that the fee may be increased at a rate not to exceed any increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) The fees assessed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be no more than necessary to cover the reasonable regulatory costs
 to the department of doing all of the following:

(1) Processing initial license applications under Section 21641 of this code and Section 21300 of the Financial Code.

(2) Processing renewal applications under Section 21642 of this code and Section 21301 of the Financial Code.

(3) Implementing, operating, and maintaining CAPSS described in Section 21627.5.

(c) All licensees holding a license issued before the effective date of the act adding this section pursuant to Section 21641 or 21642 of this code or Section 21300 or 21301 of the Financial Code shall, within 120 days after enactment of the act adding this section in the 2011–12 Regular Session, in
 addition to any fee required under subdivision (a), pay a fee not to exceed two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($288) to the Department of Justice.

(d) The fees paid pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be deposited in the Secondhand Dealer and Pawnbroker Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury. The revenue in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used by the Department of Justice for the purpose of paying for the costs described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b), except that the revenue received pursuant to subdivision (c) shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used by the Department of Justice for the purpose of paying for the costs described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(e) Applicants described in
 subdivision (a) shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and contents of a record of state convictions and state arrests and information as to the existence and contents of a record of state arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(1) The Department of Justice shall prepare a state-level response pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide subsequent notification service pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code for applicants described in this
 subdivision.

(3) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this subdivision. The fee revenues shall be deposited in the Fingerprint Fee Account and shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used by the department for the purposes of paying the costs associated with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 793, Sec. 8.   (AB 1751)   Effective September 29, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21643.

No transactions that require reporting under Section 21628, or commencing July 1, 2010, Section 21628.2, shall be engaged in with a minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 335, Sec. 9.   (SB 449)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21645.

A violation of any provision of this article under circumstances where a person knows or should have known that a violation was being committed is a misdemeanor punishable as follows:

(a) For the first offense, a fine of up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or imprisonment in the county jail up to two months, or both.

(b) For the second offense, a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail up to four months, or both.

(c) For the third, and any subsequent offense, a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or imprisonment in the county jail up to six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 826, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21646.

The district attorney or the Attorney General, in the name of the people of the State of California, may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this article or of any regulation made pertaining to the provisions of this article. Any proceeding brought hereunder shall be governed in all respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 499, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

21647.

(a) (1) If a peace officer has probable cause to believe that property, except coins, monetized bullion, or “commercial grade ingots” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 21627, in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer is lost, stolen, or embezzled, the peace officer may place a hold on the property for a period not to exceed 90 days.

(2) A 90-day hold issued pursuant to this section:

(A) Is created upon the receipt by a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer of a written notice by a peace officer that contains the following:

(i) An accurate
 description of the property being placed on the 90-day hold.

(ii) An acknowledgment that the property is being placed on hold pursuant to this section and denoting whether physical possession will remain with the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer or will be taken by the law enforcement agency instituting the 90-day hold.

(iii) The law enforcement agency’s police report or department record number, if issued, for which the property is needed as evidence.

(iv) The date the notice was delivered to the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer that shall initiate the notification period set forth in subdivisions (c) and (g).

(B) Shall
 not exceed a period of 90 calendar days, but may be renewed as provided in subparagraph (C).

(C) May be renewed as often as is required for a criminal investigation or criminal proceeding by any peace officer who is a member of the same law enforcement agency as the peace officer placing the hold on the property.

(D) Permits a peace officer to either take physical possession of the property as evidence, consistent with a peace officer’s right to a plain view seizure for a criminal investigation or criminal proceeding, or to leave the property in the possession of the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer as a custodian on behalf of the law enforcement agency.

(E) Requires the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer to maintain physical possession of the property placed on hold and
 prohibits the property’s release or disposal, except pursuant to the written authorization signed by a peace officer who is a member of the same law enforcement agency as the peace officer placing the hold on the property.

(F) Terminates when the property is no longer needed as evidence in a criminal investigation or criminal proceeding, at which time the property shall be disposed of pursuant to subdivision (d).

(G) Shall not be applicable to secure lost, stolen, or embezzled property found in the possession of an unlicensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer that has not duly and correctly reported the acquisition pursuant to Section 21628. In such a circumstance, a peace officer, having probable cause to believe the property found in the possession of an unlicensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer is lost, stolen, or embezzled, may seize the item or items consistent with the
 authority granted the peace officer under the Penal Code or any other law.

(b) (1) Whenever property that is in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, and that has been placed on hold pursuant to this section, is required by a peace officer in a criminal investigation, the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, upon reasonable notice, shall produce the property at reasonable times and places or may deliver the property to the peace officer upon the request of any peace officer.

(2) If property placed on hold pursuant to this section is physically surrendered or delivered to a law enforcement agency during the period of the hold, the hold and the pawnbroker’s lien against the property shall continue.

(c) Whenever a law enforcement agency has knowledge that property in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer has been reported as lost, stolen, or embezzled, the law enforcement agency shall, within two business days after placing the hold on the property pursuant to this section, notify in writing the person who reported the property as lost, stolen, or embezzled of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer who reported the acquisition of the property.

(2) That the law neither requires nor prohibits payment of a fee or any other condition in return for the surrender of the property, except that when the person who reported the property lost, stolen, or embezzled does not choose to participate in the prosecution of an identified alleged thief, the person shall pay the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer the “out-of-pocket” expenses paid in the acquisition of the property in return for the surrender of the property.

(3) That if the person who reported the property as lost, stolen, or embezzled takes no action to recover the property from the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer within 60 days of the mailing of
 the notice, the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer may treat the property as other property received in the ordinary course of business. During the 60-day notice period, the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer may not release the property to any other person.

(4) That a copy of the notice, with the address of the person who reported the property as lost, stolen, or embezzled deleted, will be mailed to the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer who is in possession of the property.

(d) When property that is in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer is subject to a hold as provided in subdivision (a), and the property is no longer required for the purpose of a criminal investigation or criminal proceeding, the law enforcement agency that placed the hold on the property shall release the hold on the property and return the property to the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer from which it was taken if the law enforcement agency took physical possession of the property.

(e) If a pledgor seeks to redeem property that is subject to a hold, the licensed pawnbroker shall advise the pledgor of the name of the peace officer who placed the hold on the property and the name of the law enforcement agency of which the officer is a member. If the property is not required to be held pursuant to a criminal prosecution the hold shall be released.

(f) Whenever information regarding allegedly lost, stolen, or embezzled property is entered into the Department of Justice automated property system or automated firearms system, and the property is thereafter identified and found to be in the possession of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, the property shall be placed on a hold pursuant to this section and Section 11108.5 of the Penal Code.

(g) If the hold, including any additional hold, is allowed to lapse, or 60 days elapse following the delivery of the notice required to be given by subdivision (c) to the person who reported the property to be lost, stolen, or embezzled without a claim being made by that person, whichever is later, the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer may mail under a certificate of mailing issued by the United States Post Office, addressed to the law enforcement agency that placed the property on hold, a written request to delete the property listing from the Department of Justice automated property system or automated firearms system, as is applicable. Within 30 days after the request has been mailed, the law enforcement agency shall either cause the property listing to be deleted as requested or place a hold on the property. If no law enforcement agency takes any further action with
 respect to the property within 45 days after the mailing of the request, the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer may presume that the property listing has been deleted as requested and may thereafter deal with the property accordingly, and shall not be subject to liability arising from the failure of the removal of the property listing from the Department of Justice automated property system or automated firearms system.

(h) A licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall not refuse a request to place property in their possession on hold pursuant to this section when a peace officer has probable cause to believe the property is lost, stolen, or embezzled. If a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer refuses a request to place property on hold pursuant to this section, the property may be seized with or without a warrant. The peace officer shall issue a receipt, as described in Section 21206.7 of the Financial Code, left with the licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer. The property shall be disposed of pursuant to procedures set forth in Section 21206.8 of the Financial Code, which shall apply to both licensed pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers under this section.

(i) If a search warrant is issued for the search of the business of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer to secure lost, stolen, or embezzled property that has been placed on hold, the hold shall continue for the duration that the property remains subject to the court’s jurisdiction. Notwithstanding any other law, when the use of the property seized for a criminal investigation or criminal proceeding has concluded, the property shall be disposed of pursuant to subdivision (d).

(j) If a civil or criminal court is called upon to adjudicate the competing claims of a licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer and another party claiming ownership or an interest in the property that is or was subject to a hold pursuant to this section, the court shall award possession of the property only after due consideration is given to the effect of Section 2403 of the Commercial Code.

(k) A licensed pawnbroker or secondhand dealer is not subject to civil liability for compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Resale of Goods [21650. - 21653.]

21650.

As used in this article, “adequate evidence of authority to sell” is evidence from which a reasonable person would conclude that the person presenting the evidence is the owner of the item he is attempting to sell or is the agent of such owner and is authorized by the owner to sell such item.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1174.)
-------------------------------------------

21651.

As used in this article,

(a) “Junk dealer” has the meaning defined in Section 21601; and

(b) “Secondhand dealer” has the meaning defined in Section 21626.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1174.)
-------------------------------------------

21652.

Every junk dealer or secondhand dealer shall, before accepting for resale from any person any finished product, new item of finished or merchandisable quality, inventory item of new materials or finished quality, or other goods and materials in such a state or condition as to show that they are neither abandoned nor scrapped, shall require that such person present adequate evidence of authority to sell. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1174.)
-------------------------------------------

21653.

Every junk dealer or secondhand dealer who resells any item acquired in violation of Section 21652 is guilty of a felony, if the value of the item exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), and is guilty of a misdemeanor if the value of the item does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Swap Meets, Flea Markets, and Open-Air Markets [21660. - 21669.1.]

21660.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to require the reporting of personal property exchanged, sold, or offered for sale or exchange at swap meets, flea markets, and open-air markets, and information regarding vendors selling or displaying new merchandise, for the purpose of ensuring that swap meet, open-air market, and flea market operators and vendors are in complete compliance with all state laws and regulations applicable to displaying, offering for sale, selling, and exchanging new and previously owned merchandise.

This article shall apply to operators and vendors at swap meets, flea markets, and open-air markets unless the merchandise or the transaction is specifically exempt under this article and shall not be superseded or supplanted by any provisions or ordinances or charters of any city, county, or city and county, nor supplemented by any local ordinances or charters or provisions. Nothing contained in this article shall be deemed to affect the land use and zoning regulatory power of a local agency, nor be construed to require any local agency to permit swap meets, flea markets, or open-air markets if local land use or zoning regulations prohibit those operations.

Any transaction that is regulated by this article shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 21625), regulating transactions in identifiable secondhand tangible personal property. No person, partnership, or corporation shall be considered a “secondhand dealer” within the meaning of Section 21626 because of activities regulated by this article.

Article 5 (commencing with Section 21650) of this chapter shall not apply to operators or vendors at swap meets, flea markets, or open-air markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21661.

(a) As used in this article, the term “swap meet” includes a flea market or an open-air market and means an event at which two or more persons offer merchandise for sale or exchange and that meets one of the following conditions:

(1) A fee is charged for the privilege of offering or displaying merchandise for sale or exchange.

(2) A fee is charged to prospective buyers for parking or for admission to the area where merchandise is offered or displayed for sale or exchange.

(3) The event is held more than six times in any 12-month period.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the term “swap meet,” as used in this article, includes a flea market or an open-air market and means an event, regardless of the number of persons offering or displaying personal property or the absence of fees, at which used personal property is offered or displayed for sale or exchange if the event is held more than six times in any 12-month period.

(c) The term “swap meet,” as used in this article, is interchangeable and applicable to “flea markets,” “indoor swap meets,” “open-air markets,” or other similar terms, regardless of whether these events are held either inside a building or outside in the open. The primary characteristic is that these activities involve a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute a regular course of business.

(d) “Operator,” as used in this article, means any person, partnership, organization or corporation that controls, manages, conducts or otherwise administers a swap meet.

(e) “Vendor,” as used in this article, means any person, partnership, organization or corporation who exchanges, sells, or offers for sale or exchange any merchandise at a swap meet. A swap meet vendor shall be classified according to the following categories:

(1) A “casual swap meet vendor” means a vendor who participates in a swap meet two times or less per year.

(2) A “regular swap meet vendor” means a vendor who participates in a swap meet three or more times per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21662.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to:

(a) An event held not more than two times per calendar year that is organized for the exclusive benefit of any community chest, fund, foundation, association, or corporation organized and operated for religious, educational, hospital, or charitable purposes, if no part of any admission fee or parking fee charged vendors or prospective purchasers, or the gross receipts or net earnings from the sale or exchange of merchandise, whether in the form of a percentage of the receipts or earnings, as salary, or otherwise, inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or person participating in the organization or conduct of the event.

(b) An event at which all of the merchandise offered or displayed is new, and all persons selling, exchanging, offering, or displaying merchandise for sale or exchange are manufacturers or licensed retail or wholesale merchants.

(c) Any vehicle or trailer or any vehicle accessory or vehicle part usable for a motor vehicle eligible for vehicle registration under Section 5004 of the Vehicle Code, and items of memorabilia or history, or both, relating to these vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 334, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21663.

(a) Except as provided in Section 21663.1, every vendor shall report all merchandise offered or displayed for sale or exchange on a form, prescribed or approved by the California Department of Justice, containing all the following information:

(1) The name and address of the vendor.

(2) A description of the merchandise offered for sale or exchange, including serial numbers and personal identification marks, or if there is no serial number, other identification marks or symbols, if any, or a general description of the item.

(3) A certification by the vendor that to his or her knowledge and belief, the information contained on the form is true.

(4) The make, year, color, state of registration, and license number of the vehicle or vehicles in which the merchandise is transported to the swap meet.

(5) The California seller’s permit number (State Board of Equalization sales tax number), if any, of the vendor.

(6) The vendor’s motor vehicle driver’s license number and its state of issuance or California identification card numbers.

(7) If the vendor is an agent of an individual, company, partnership or corporation, the name and business address of the principal.

(8) The dates of sale for which the report is made.

(9) A receipt number given by the operator for the dates of the sale or the space used by the vendor.

(10) A requirement that the vendor check an appropriate box that sets forth his or her permit number for sales tax purposes.

If the vendor’s permit number is not listed in the appropriate place on the form, the vendor shall indicate that he or she has not and does not contemplate making more than two sales of sufficient size, scope, and character within a 12-month period to require a permit.

(b) In addition to the official governmental form, consisting of an original and at least two copies, the information required may be recorded on a computerized or other similar record that contains the same information required by subdivision (a).

(c) In no case shall a swap meet owner or operator be liable or responsible for the accuracy of, or any discrepancy in, any information submitted by the vendors on the forms provided to them by the swap meet owners or operators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 334, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21663.1.

(a) A vendor selling or displaying new merchandise and a vendor holding a business license issued by a city, county, or city and county of this state are not required to comply with Section 21633 if the swap meet is conducted at the same location at least once per month on real property owned by the operator or leased to the operator for a period of not less than one year.

(b) A vendor meeting the conditions of subdivision (a) shall, at a minimum, provide the operator with the following information prior to offering or displaying merchandise for sale at the event:

(1) The name and address of the vendor.

(2) The vendor’s California seller’s permit number (State Board of Equalization sales tax number).

(3) The vendor’s motor vehicle driver’s license number and its state of issuance or his or her California identification card number.

(4) The vendor’s business license number and its city or county of issuance, unless the vendor is operating under a business license issued to the operator.

(c) The operator shall maintain the information required by this section in written or electronic form for six months after the date of its receipt and shall make copies of the information available for inspection, upon request, to any peace officer or any authorized representative of the Board of Equalization or Department of Justice.

(d) In no case shall the operator be liable for the accuracy of, or any discrepancy in, any information submitted by a vendor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 334, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21664.

(a) The swap meet operator shall obtain sufficient blank forms from the Department of Justice at a cost not to exceed the actual cost to the department, or shall cause to be printed and be available sufficient forms approved by the department, for the use of vendors attending the swap meet, and shall distribute them to vendors as needed. The vendor shall submit the completed form to the operator who shall note on the vendor’s copy that the vendor has submitted the form. The vendor shall submit the form to the swap meet operator prior to the close of the business day on which the item is to be placed on sale. The swap meet operator shall provide this form required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 to the chief of police, if the swap meet occurs within the territorial limits of an incorporated city, or the sheriff, if the swap meet occurs outside a city, within 24 hours, or, before the end of the first working day following the swap meet. The original shall also be available to the State Board of Equalization to permit them to detect possible sales tax evasion. The reports shall not be utilized by a chief of police, a sheriff, the Department of Justice, or any other governmental agency for the purpose of providing a permanent record of property ownership, nor shall the information derived from these reports form the basis for any record other than reports which assist in tracing and recovering of stolen property or assist in detecting sales tax evasion.
